New York, session 2025-2026, S7301.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 145.75 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 145.75 Desecration of property commemorating a historical figure. 4 A person is guilty of desecration of property commemorating a histor- 5 ical figure when with intent to damage property of another person, and 6 having no right to do so nor any reasonable ground to believe that they 7 have such right, such person: 8 (a) damages any real or personal property, including but not limited 9 to any commemorative monument, marker or street sign, relating to any 10 person, living or dead, who has historical or cultural significance; or 11 (b) with intent to steal personal property, such person steals 12 personal property, including but not limited to any commemorative monu- 13 ment, marker or street sign, relating to any person, living or dead, who 14 has historical or cultural significance. 15 Desecration of property commemorating a historical figure is a class C 16 felony. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 18 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07256-01-5